Utah statutes.
39-6-71.   Solicitation of desertion, mutiny, or other act of misconduct.

(1)  A person subject to this chapter who solicits or advises one or more other persons to desert in violation of Section 39-6-74 or mutiny in violation of Section 39-6-83 shall, if the offense solicited or advised is attempted or committed, be punished with the punishment provided for the commission of the offense.  But if the offense solicited or advised is not committed or attempted, the person shall be punished as a military court directs.

(2)  A person subject to this chapter who solicits or advises another to commit an act of misconduct under this chapter shall, if the offense solicited or advised is committed, be punished with the punishment provided for the commission of the offense.  But if the offense solicited or advised is not committed, he shall be punished as a military court directs.



Enacted by Chapter 210, 1988 General Session

